Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-9213
Continuing education.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an individual who holds a resident public adjuster license or a nonresident public adjuster license shall satisfactorily complete a minimum of twenty-four credits of continuing education, including three credits of ethics, reported on a biennial basis in conjunction with the license renewal cycle.

(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to a nonresident public adjuster who has met the continuing education requirements of the adjuster’s home state and whose home state gives credit to residents of this state on the same basis.

(3) Only continuing education activities approved by the director pursuant to sections 44-3901 to 44-3908 shall be used to satisfy the requirements of this section.

Laws 2018, LB743, § 13.